epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/af.xml
		y4far
		yf5as.
		yf3l
		y2f3r
		yf5ren
		yf4sl
		yf4su
		y1g
		yg4le
		yg4li
		yg4ly
		yg5saa
		ygs7kans
		yg5sko
		ygs5le
		ygs6tek
		yg4sto
		yg4stu
		ykaar4
		yker6st
		y4k5ins
		y2kl
		yk3li
		yk4lu
		yk5lui
		yk5lus
		ykoms4
		y4kor
		yk3ri
		yk4s5ad
		yk4sk
		yks7kans
		yk3sp
		yks4t
		yk4su
		y2k3w
		y1la
		y1lo
		y4loe
		yls7laar
		y2n1a
		yn4a.
		y4nei
		y4n5ete
		yn1g2
		yn5kli
		yn5kwa
		y2n1o
		y3n4om
		yns6agt
		yn4s5am
		yns5ins
		yn5sly
		yns4m
		yns7maan
		yn4s5or
		yn4sp
		yns7paar
		yns4t
		yn3u
		yo9yo.
		y2p
		y3pa
		y3pe
		y3pi
		y5plan
		yp3li
		yp5org
		y3pr
		y3pu
		y1r
		y4sam
		ys4ig
		y4s5ind
		y4s5ins
		y2sk
		ys5kar
		ys3ko
		y5s4koo
		y2s3l
		y2s3n
		y2s3o
		ys4ok
		ys4ou
		ys5poe
		ys3t
		ys4ta
		y4s5taf
		y5s4tel
		y4ster
		y3s4tr
		ys4tu
		ys3ui
		ys3w
		y2t
		y3ta
		yt3ag
		y3te
		yt4ha
		y3ti
		y3tj
		y3to
		y3tu
		y3ty
		yve7sant
		1z
		2z.
		4zbur
		zee7rust
		zen7elle
		zi2c
		zi5cat
		4zman
		zook6a.
		2zz
		2-1
		-er4t
		-ert5j
		-ha-7ha.
		-k4li
		-na6gew
		-s4ti
		-t4we
		-5twee
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
